Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 12.37.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“communications common carrier” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

;

“contents” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

;

“court” means superior court, except that in AS

12.37.200

it means either superior or district court;

“electronic communication” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

;

“electronic communication service” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

;

“electronic storage” means any temporary, intermediate storage of a wire or electronic communication incidental to the electronic transmission of the communication, and any storage of the communication by an electronic communication service for purposes of backup protection of the communication;

“in-progress trace” means to determine the origin of a wire communication to a telephone instrument, equipment, or facility during the course of the communication;

“intercept” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

;

“official proceeding” means a judicial, legislative, or administrative proceeding or any other proceeding before a government agency or official authorized to hear evidence under oath, other than a grand jury;

“oral communication” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

;

“peace officer” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

;

“pen register” means a device or apparatus that is connected to a telephone instrument, equipment, or facility to determine the destination of a wire communication to a telephone instrument, equipment, or facility, but that does not intercept the contents of the communication; “pen register” does not include a device used by a provider or customer of a wire or electronic communication service for billing, or for recording as an incident to billing, for communications services provided by the provider, nor a device used by a provider or customer of a wire communication service for cost accounting or other like purposes in the ordinary course of its business;

“private communication” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

;

“trap device” means a device or apparatus that is connected to a telephone instrument, equipment, or facility to determine the origin of a wire communication to the telephone instrument, equipment, or facility, but that does not intercept the contents of the communication;

“wire communication” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 61 SLA 1993; am §§
36 — 38 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2008, the paragraphs of this section were renumbered to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (7), (12), and (14), deleted “or telegraph” following “a telephone” five times.